Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20168-345.01
Automatic teller machines; authorized.

Nothing in section 8-157.01 shall prohibit building and loan associations as defined in sections 8-301 to 8-340.01 from establishing and operating new automatic teller machines for the purpose of transmitting savings and loan transactions.

Laws 1975, LB 508, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 53;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 14;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB760, § 4.
July 21, 2016